Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-512
Department of Revenue; law enforcement agency; powers and duties.

The Department of Revenue or any law enforcement agency may require any proper investigation or audit of any qualifying nonprofit organization which conducts any lottery or raffle under the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, either for the specific purpose of determining whether the provisions of the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act are being complied with or for the specific purpose of ensuring that the provisions of the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, or the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act are not being violated. No audit or investigation shall be conducted under this section except as is absolutely necessary for the department or the agency to fulfill its necessary and proper duties.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 170.

Nebraska Bingo Act, see section 9-201.

Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, see section 9-601.

Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-401.

Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, see section 9-301.